Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 25 Rhode Island Campaign Contributions and Expenditures Reporting

17-25-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Campaign Contributions and Expenditures Reporting Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1.

17-25-2.
Declaration of policy.

It is declared to be in the public interest and to be the policy of the state to require the reporting of certain contributions received and expenditures made to aid or promote the nomination, election, or defeat of all candidates for public office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 1.

17-25-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Business entity” means any corporation, whether for profit or not for profit, domestic corporation or foreign corporation, as defined in §

7-1.2-106

, financial institution, cooperative, association, receivership, trust, holding company, firm, joint stock company, public utility, sole proprietorship, partnership, limited partnership, or any other entity recognized by the laws of the United States and/or the state of Rhode Island for the purpose of doing business. The term “business entity” shall not include a political action committee organized pursuant to this chapter or a political party committee or an authorized campaign committee of a candidate or office holder. The term “business entity” shall not include any exempt nonprofit as defined herein or any organization described in § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code of the United States, as amended from time to time, for the purposes of chapter 25.3 of title 17.

“Candidate” means any individual who undertakes any action, whether preliminary or final, which is necessary under the law to qualify for nomination for election or election to public office, and/or any individual who receives a contribution or makes an expenditure, or gives his or her consent for any other person to receive a contribution or make an expenditure, with a view to bringing about his or her nomination or election to any public office, whether or not the specific public office for which he or she will seek nomination or election is known at the time the contribution is received or the expenditure is made and whether or not he or she has announced his or her candidacy or filed a declaration of candidacy at that time.

“Conduit” or “intermediary” means any person who receives and forwards an earmarked contribution to a candidate or a candidate’s authorized committee, except as otherwise limited in this chapter.

“Contributions” and “expenditures” include all transfers of money, credit or debit card transactions, on-line or electronic payment systems such as “pay pal,” paid personal services, or other thing of value to or by any candidate, committee of a political party, or political action committee or ballot question advocate. A loan shall be considered a contribution of money until it is repaid.

“Earmarked” means a designation, instruction, or encumbrance, whether direct or indirect, express or implied, oral or written, that results in all or any part of a contribution or expenditure being made to, or expended on behalf of, a clearly identified candidate or a candidate’s authorized committee.

“Election” means any primary, general, or special election or town meeting for any public office of the state, municipality, or district, or for the determination of any question submitted to the voters of the state, municipality, or district.

“Election cycle” means the twenty-four month (24) period commencing on January 1 of odd number years and ending on December 31 of even number years; provided, with respect to the public financing of election campaigns of general officers under §§

17-25-19

,

17-25-20

, and

17-25-25

, “election cycle” means the forty-eight month (48) period commencing on January 1 of odd numbered years and ending December 31 of even numbered years.

“In-kind contributions” means the monetary value of other things of value or paid personal services donated to, or benefiting, any person required to file reports with the board of elections.

“Other thing of value” means any item of tangible real or personal property of a fair-market value in excess of one hundred dollars ($100).

“Paid personal services” means personal services of every kind and nature, the cost or consideration for which is paid or provided by someone other than the committee or candidate for whom the services are rendered, but shall not include personal services provided without compensation by persons volunteering their time.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, committee, association, corporation, union, charity, and/or any other organization. The term “person” shall not include any exempt nonprofit as defined herein or any organization described in § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code of the United States, as amended from time to time, for the purposes of chapter 25.3 of title 17 only.

“Political action committee” means any group of two (2) or more persons that accepts any contributions to be used for advocating the election or defeat of any candidate or candidates. Only political action committees that have accepted contributions from fifteen (15) or more persons in amounts of ten dollars ($10.00) or more within an election cycle shall be permitted to make contributions, and those committees must make contributions to at least five (5) candidates for state or local office within an election cycle.

“Public office” means any state, municipal, school, or district office or other position that is filled by popular election, except political party offices. “Political party offices” means any state, city, town, ward, or representative or senatorial district committee office of a political party or delegate to a political party convention, or any similar office.

“State” means state of Rhode Island.

“Testimonial affair” means an affair of any kind or nature including, but not limited to, cocktail parties, breakfasts, luncheons, dinners, dances, picnics, or similar affairs expressly and directly intended to raise campaign funds in behalf of a candidate to be used for nomination or election to a public office in this state, or expressly and directly intended to raise funds in behalf of any state or municipal committee of a political party, or expressly and directly intended to raise funds in behalf of any political action committee.

“Electioneering communication” means any print, broadcast, cable, satellite, or electronic media communication not coordinated, as set forth in §

17-25-23

, with any candidate, authorized candidate campaign committee, or political party committee and that unambiguously identifies a candidate or referendum and is made either within sixty (60) days before a general or special election or town meeting for the office sought by the candidate or referendum; or thirty (30) days before a primary election, for the office sought by the candidate; and is targeted to the relevant electorate.

A communication that refers to a clearly identified candidate or referendum is “targeted to the relevant electorate” if the communication can be received by two thousand (2,000) or more persons in the district the candidate seeks to represent or the constituency voting on the referendum.

Exceptions: The term “electioneering communication” does not include:

A communication appearing in a news story, commentary, or editorial distributed through the facilities of any broadcasting station, unless such facilities are owned or controlled by any political party, political committee, or candidate;

A communication that constitutes a candidate debate or forum conducted pursuant to regulations adopted by the board of elections or that solely promotes such a debate or forum and is made by or on behalf of the person sponsoring the debate or forum;

A communication made by any business entity to its members, owners, stockholders, or employees;

A communication over the internet, except for (I) Communications placed for a fee on the website of another person, business entity, or political action committee; and (II) Websites formed primarily for the purpose, or whose primary purpose is, to expressly advocate the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or the passage or defeat of a referendum; or

Any other communication exempted under such regulations as the board of elections may promulgate (consistent with the requirements of this paragraph) to ensure the appropriate implementation of this paragraph.

“Independent expenditure” means an expenditure that, when taken as a whole, expressly advocates the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate, or the passage or defeat of a referendum, or amounts to the functional equivalent of such express advocacy, and is in no way coordinated, as set forth in §

17-25-23

, with any candidate’s campaign, authorized candidate committee, or political party committee. An expenditure amounts to the functional equivalent of express advocacy if it can only be interpreted by a reasonable person as advocating the election, passage, or defeat of a candidate or referendum, taking into account whether the communication mentions a candidate or referendum and takes a position on a candidate’s character, qualifications, or fitness for office. An independent expenditure is not a contribution to that candidate or committee.

Exceptions: The term “independent expenditure” does not include:

A communication appearing in a news story, commentary, or editorial distributed through the facilities of any broadcasting station, unless such facilities are owned or controlled by any political party, political committee, or candidate;

A communication that constitutes a candidate debate or forum conducted pursuant to regulations adopted by the board of elections or that solely promotes such a debate or forum and is made by or on behalf of the person sponsoring the debate or forum;

A communication made by any business entity to its members, owners, stockholders, or employees;

A communication over the internet, except for (I) Communications placed for a fee on the website of another person, business entity, or political action committee; and (II) Websites formed primarily for the purpose, or whose primary purpose is, to expressly advocate the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or the passage or defeat of a referendum; or

Any other communication exempted under such regulations as the board of elections may promulgate (consistent with the requirements of this paragraph) to ensure the appropriate implementation of this paragraph.

“Covered transfer” means any transfer or payment of funds by any person, business entity, or political action committee to another person, business entity, or political action committee if the person, business entity, or political action committee making the transfer: (i) Designates, requests, or suggests that the amounts be used for independent expenditures or electioneering communications or making a transfer to another person for the purpose of making or paying for such independent expenditures or electioneering communications; (ii) Made such transfer or payment in response to a solicitation or other request for a transfer or payment for the making of or paying for independent expenditures or electioneering communications or making a transfer to another person for the purpose of making or paying for such independent expenditures or electioneering communications; (iii) Engaged in discussions with the recipient of the transfer or payment regarding independent expenditures or electioneering communications or making a transfer to another person for the purpose of making or paying for such independent expenditures or electioneering communications; or (iv) Made independent expenditures or electioneering communications in an aggregate amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more during the two-year (2) period ending on the date of the transfer or payment, or knew or had reason to know that the person receiving the transfer or payment made such independent expenditures or electioneering communications in such an aggregate amount during that two-year (2) period.

Exceptions: The term “covered transfer” does not include:

A transfer or payment made by a person, business entity, or political action committee in the ordinary course of any trade or business conducted by the person, business entity, or political action committee or in the form of investments made by the person, business entity, or political action committee; or

A transfer or payment made by a person, business entity, or political action committee if the person, business entity, or political action committee making the transfer prohibited, in writing, the use of such transfer or payment for independent expenditures, electioneering communications, or covered transfers and the recipient of the transfer or payment agreed to follow the prohibition and deposited the transfer or payment in an account that is segregated from any account used to make independent expenditures, electioneering communications, or covered transfers.

For the purposes of chapter 25.3 of title 17, “donation” means all transfers of money, credit or debit card transactions, on-line or electronic payment systems such as “pay pal,” paid personal services, or other thing of value to or by any person, business entity, or political action committee. A loan shall be considered a donation of money until it is repaid.

For the purposes of chapter 25.3 of title 17, “donor” means a person, business entity, or political action committee that makes a donation.

“Exempt nonprofit” means any organization described in § 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code that spends an aggregate annual amount of no more than ten percent (10%) of its annual expenses or no more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), whichever is less, on independent expenditures, electioneering communications, and covered transfers as defined herein and certifies the same to the board of elections seven (7) days before and after a primary election and seven (7) days before and after a general or special election.

For purposes of chapter 25.3 of title 17, “referendum” means the same as the definition set forth in §

17-5-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 78, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 14; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 14; P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 582, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 588, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 446, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 240, § 1.

17-25-4.
Applicability.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply in any primary, general, or special election or town meeting for any public office of the state, municipality, or district or for the determination of any question submitted to the voters of the state, municipality, or district.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 1.

17-25-5.
Duties and powers of the board of elections.

The board of elections is authorized to perform any duties that are necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter. Without limiting the generality of this provision, the board is authorized and empowered to:

Develop forms for the making of the required reports to be filed with the board of elections, which form shall contain a notice setting forth the times and dates when reports are required to be filed;

Prepare and publish a manual for all candidates, political party committees, political action committees and ballot questions advocates prescribing the requirements of the law, including uniform methods of bookkeeping and reporting and requirements as to the length of time that any person required to keep any records pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall retain these records, or any class or category of records, or any other documents;

Adopt rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Prepare and make available for public inspection, through the office of the board of elections, summaries of all reports grouped according to candidates and political parties;

Make all campaign finance reports available electronically on the board of election’s website no later than two (2) business days after the reports are received by the board of elections;

Take any steps that may be necessary or appropriate to make all campaign finance reports available in an electronic searchable format on the board of election’s website no later than one business day after the reports are received by the board of elections commencing with the first quarterly reporting period in 2010.

Prepare and publish, prior to May 1 or as soon as practicable thereafter of each year, an annual report to the general assembly;

Ascertain whether candidates or political party committees, political action committees or ballot questions advocates, have failed to file reports or have filed defective reports; and may for good cause shown extend the dates upon which reports are required to be filed;

Conduct confidential investigations and/or closed hearings in accordance with this title relative to alleged violations of this chapter either on its own initiative or upon receipt of a verified written complaint, which complaint shall, under pain and penalty of perjury, be based upon actual knowledge and not merely on information and belief. Upon completion of its investigation and/or hearings, if the board has reason to believe that a violation of this chapter has occurred or that a complainant has willfully sworn or affirmed falsely, the chairperson of the board of elections is authorized to and shall issue to the person found to be in violation of this chapter a summons pursuant to §

12-7-11

to appear before the division of the district court where the person resides and shall be prosecuted by the attorney general. Any action taken by the board as a result of a written verified complaint shall, whenever possible, be completed no later than five (5) business days after its receipt, and if no violation is found to exist, all records and papers shall be kept confidential unless further legal proceedings are instituted.

The confidentiality of an audit, investigation, hearing, and/or findings may be waived in writing only by the person or persons complained of or audited. However, once an audit is complete and presented to the board, the audit will be a matter of public record.

Conduct compliance reviews and audits of campaign accounts as necessary, and in a manner consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

The board of elections shall take any steps that may be necessary or appropriate to furnish timely and adequate information, in appropriate printed summaries and in any other form that it may see fit, to every candidate or prospective candidate for public office who becomes or is likely to become subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to every treasurer duly designated under the provisions of this chapter, informing them of their actual or prospective obligations and responsibilities under this chapter.

The board of elections is authorized, upon written request, to render written advisory opinions as to whether a given set of facts and circumstances set forth in the request would constitute a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, or whether a given set of facts and circumstances set forth in the request would render any person subject to any of the reporting requirements of this chapter; provided, that the requirement for a written opinion may be voluntarily waived by the candidate or committee.

Unless an extension of time is consented to by any person who submits a written request for an advisory opinion, the board of elections shall, whenever possible, render its written advisory opinion within five (5) business days of receipt of the request.

For each quarterly report required to be filed, the board shall send a postcard by regular mail to each person and entity required to file a report, which will notify the person or entity that a report required to be filed is due within fourteen (14) days.

The failure to receive this notice shall not absolve the person or entity of the reporting requirements contained in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 529, § 1.

17-25-5.1.
Manual of legal requirements.

The board of elections shall prepare and publish a manual prescribing the requirements of the law, and the secretary of state shall have copies of the manual available for individuals filing candidacy papers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 347, § 1.

17-25-5.2.
Segregation of campaign funds.

All campaign funds received and expended by a candidate, office holder, treasurer, or deputy treasurer, subject to the provisions of this chapter, shall be segregated from all other accounts. The candidate or office holder must maintain a separate campaign account, which shall not contain any non-campaign funds, at a financial institution that has a physical branch within this state. The comingling of a candidate’s personal or business funds with campaign funds is expressly prohibited. As used herein, the term “financial institution” includes a bank or a credit union.

Applicability to political action committees. The provisions of this section shall apply to political action committees, as well as to individual candidates and office holders.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 20, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 23, § 1.

17-25-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 3.

17-25-7.
Contents of reports to be filed by treasurers of candidates and committees.

Each campaign treasurer of a candidate, each state and municipal committee of a political party, and each political action committee shall keep accurate records and make a full report, upon a form prescribed by the board of elections, of all contributions received, and expenditures made, by it in excess of a total of one hundred dollars ($100) from any one source within a calendar year, in furtherance of the nomination, election, or defeat of any candidate or the approval or rejection of any question submitted to the voters, or at any financial town meeting, financial town referendum, or other election at which amendments to a city or town charter are proposed, during the period from the date of the last report, or in the case of the initial report, beginning on the date of the appointment of the campaign treasurer for state and municipal committees and political action committees and on the date a person becomes a “candidate” as defined in §

17-25-3(2)

for individual candidates. The report shall contain the name, address, and place of employment of each person or source from whom the contributions and expenditures in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) were received or made and the amount contributed or expended by each person or source. The report shall be filed with the board of elections on the dates designated in §

17-25-11

. The campaign treasurer of the candidate or committee reporting shall certify to the correctness of each report. Notwithstanding any other provisions contained in this title, this subsection shall apply to any person or entity advocating the approval or rejection of any question presented to voters at any financial town meeting, financial town referendum, or other election at which amendments to a city or town charter are proposed, which shall file reports of contributions or expenditures in accordance with the filing schedule established by §

17-25-11

if the total of the money so expended exceeds one hundred dollars ($100) in a calendar year. As used in this subsection, the word “entity” means any political action committee, political party committee, authorized campaign committee of a candidate or officer holder, corporation, whether for profit, not-for-profit, or exempt nonprofit pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, domestic corporation or foreign corporation, as defined in §

7-1.2-106

, financial institution, cooperative, association, receivership, partnership, committee, union, charity, trust, holding company, firm, joint stock company, public utility, sole proprietorship, limited partnership, or any other entity recognized by the laws of the United States and/or the state of Rhode Island.

Each state and municipal committee of a political party shall also file with the board of elections, not later than March 1 of each year, an annual report setting forth in the aggregate all contributions received and all expenditures made during the previous calendar year, whether or not these expenditures were made, incurred, or authorized in furtherance of the election or defeat of any candidate. The treasurer of the committee or organization reporting shall certify to the correctness of each report.

Any report filed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall include contributions received from any “testimonial affair,” as defined in §

17-25-3

, held since the date of the most recent report filed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 423, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 424, § 1.

17-25-7.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 2, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 4, effective April 29, 1992.

17-25-7.2.
Personal use of campaign funds prohibited.

The personal use by any elected public office holder or by any candidate for public office, as defined in §

17-25-3

, of campaign funds contributed after April 29, 1992, is prohibited. For the purposes of this section, “personal use” is defined as any use other than expenditures related to gaining or holding public office and for which the candidate for public office or elected public official would be required to treat the amount of the expenditure as gross income under § 61 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 61, or any subsequent corresponding Internal Revenue Code of the United States, as from time to time amended.

Expenditures that are specifically prohibited under this chapter include:

Any residential or household items, supplies, or expenditures, including mortgage, rent, or utility payments for any part of any personal residence of a candidate or officeholder or a member of the candidate’s or officeholder’s family;

Mortgage, rent, or utility payments for any part of any nonresidential property that is owned by a candidate or officeholder or a member of a candidate’s or officeholder’s family and used for campaign purposes, to the extent the payments exceed the fair-market value of the property usage;

Funeral, cremation, or burial expenses, including any expenses related to deaths within a candidate’s or officeholder’s family;

Clothing, other than items of de minimis value that are used in the campaign;

Tuition payments;

Dues, fees, or gratuities at a country club, health club, recreational facility or other nonpolitical organization, unless they are part of a specific fundraising event that takes place on the organization’s premises;

Salary payments to a member of a candidate’s family, unless the family member is providing bona fide services to the campaign. If a family member provides bona fide services to a campaign, any salary payments in excess of the fair-market value of the services provided is personal use;

Admission to a sporting event, concert, theater, or other form of entertainment, unless part of a specific campaign or officeholder activity;

Payment of any fines, fees, or penalties assessed pursuant to this chapter.

Any expense that results from campaign or officeholder activity is permitted use of campaign funds. Such expenditures may include:

The defrayal of ordinary and necessary expenses of a candidate or officeholder;

Office expenses and equipment, provided the expenditures and the use of the equipment can be directly attributable to the campaign or the officeholder’s duties and responsibilities;

Donations to charitable organizations, provided the candidate or officeholder does not personally benefit from the donation or receive compensation from the recipient organization;

Travel expenses for an officeholder, provided that the travel is undertaken as an ordinary and necessary expense of seeking, holding, or maintaining public office, or seeking, holding, or maintaining a position within the legislature or other publicly elected body. If a candidate or officeholder uses campaign funds to pay expenses associated with travel that involves both personal activities and campaign or officeholder activities, the incremental expenses that result from the personal activities are personal use, unless the person(s) benefiting from this use reimburse(s) the campaign account within thirty (30) days for the amount of the incremental expenses;

Gifts of nominal value and donations of a nominal amount made on a special occasion such as a holiday, graduation, marriage, retirement, or death, unless made to a member of the candidate’s or officeholder’s family;

Meal expenses that are incurred as part of a campaign activity or as a part of a function that is related to the candidate’s or officeholder’s responsibilities, including meals between and among candidates and/or officeholders that are incurred as an ordinary and necessary expense of seeking, holding, or maintaining public office, or seeking, holding, or maintaining a position within the legislature or other publicly elected body;

Food and beverages that are purchased as part of a campaign or officeholder activity;

Communication access expenses that are incurred as part of a campaign activity and operation to ensure that deaf and hard-of-hearing citizens are fully participating, are volunteers, and/or are otherwise maintaining a position with the campaign committee. Examples of communication access expenses include, but are not limited to, the following: captioning on television advertisements; video clips; sign language interpreters; computer-aided real-time (CART) services; and assistive listening devices;

Childcare expenses that are incurred as a result of campaign activity or the officeholder’s responsibilities.

Any campaign funds not used to pay for the expenses of gaining or holding public office may:

Be maintained in a campaign account(s);

Be donated to a candidate for public office, to a political organization, or to a political action committee, subject to the limitation on contributions in §

17-25-10.1

;

Be transferred, in whole or in part, into a newly established political action committee or ballot question advocate;

Be donated to a tax-exempt charitable organization as that term is used in § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 501, or any subsequent, corresponding internal revenue code of the United States as from time to time amended;

Be donated to the state of Rhode Island; or

Be returned to the donor; provided, however:

Any funds remaining in a campaign account(s) of a candidate or officeholder, or former candidate or former officeholder, who dies, after repayment of loans and accounts payable, shall be disposed, in accordance with the instructions in writing, on a form prescribed by the board of elections, which funds may:

Be donated to a candidate for public office, to a political organization, or to a political action committee, subject to the limitation on contributions in §

17-25-10.1

;

Be transferred, in whole or in part, into a newly established political action committee or ballot question advocate;

Be donated to a tax-exempt charitable organization as that term is used in § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 501, or any subsequent, corresponding internal revenue code of the United States as from time to time amended; or

Be returned to the donor.

The candidate’s or officeholder’s, or former candidate’s or former officeholder’s, campaign account(s) shall be dissolved by the board of elections;

Any penalties assessed to the candidate or officeholder, or former candidate or former officeholder, that are outstanding at the time of their death shall be waived by the board of elections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 277, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 406, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 407, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

17-25-7.3.
Testimonial proceeds intended for personal use prohibited.

It is unlawful for any candidate for public office, as defined in §

17-25-3

, or any elected public office holder to accept the proceeds of any testimonial, as defined in §

17-25-3

, for personal use, as defined in §

17-25-7.2

, which were received after April 29, 1992. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the use of testimonials for the lawful purpose of raising campaign funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 2.

17-25-7.4.
Limitations on repayment of loans.

Campaign contributions received pursuant to this chapter shall not be used to repay cumulative personal loans that were made on or after April 29, 1992, to a campaign by a candidate in excess of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) during an election cycle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 2.

17-25-7.5.
Electronic reporting — Declaration of purpose.

The State of Rhode Island is committed to facilitating public access to reports of campaign contributions and expenditures by candidates for public office and other entities required to file campaign finance reports.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 1.

17-25-7.6.
Electronic reporting.

The filing of campaign finance reports to the board of elections shall commence in accordance with the following schedule:

Candidates for general office shall commence filing campaign finance reports electronically beginning with the report required to be filed for the first quarterly reporting period in 2002.

All other candidates for public office and political parties, other than state political parties, who raise or expend more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) annually, or whose report shows a balance of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more in their campaign fund shall commence filing campaign finance reports electronically beginning with the second quarterly reporting period in 2008; provided, that all candidates may commence filing campaign finance reports electronically beginning with the first report required to be filed for the first quarterly reporting period in 2002.

State political parties, political action committees and vendors required to file campaign finance reports and who raise or expend more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) annually, or whose report shows a balance of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more in their campaign fund shall do so commencing with the first report required to be filed for the first quarterly reporting period in 2002.

The board of elections shall have the authority to adopt regulations to implement and administer the provisions of this section.

Notwithstanding anything else in this section and subject to the implementation of an electronic reporting and tracking system, the board of elections shall have the authority to delay implementation of the requirements of this section by up to ninety (90) days.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 529, § 1.

17-25-8.
Appointment of campaign treasurer by candidate — Filings.

Each candidate in an election shall file a “notice of organization” with the board of elections and appoint one campaign treasurer before receiving any contribution or expending any money in furtherance or aid of the candidate’s candidacy. The “notice of organization” shall include the name and address of the candidate, the campaign treasurer, and the committee being established. The candidate shall declare the office being sought and shall comply with the financial statement requirement of §

36-14-16(c)

.

A candidate may appoint deputy campaign treasurers as required. The candidate shall file the names and addresses of deputy campaign treasurers with the board of elections.

A candidate may remove a campaign treasurer or deputy campaign treasurer. In the case of the death, resignation, or removal of a campaign treasurer, the candidate shall appoint a successor as soon as practicable and shall file his or her name and address with the board of elections within ten (10) days. A candidate may serve as his or her own campaign treasurer, and upon failure to designate a treasurer, the candidate shall be designated his or her own treasurer by the board of elections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 229, § 1.

17-25-8.1.
Appointment of treasurer by political action committee — Filings.

Each political action committee shall appoint one campaign treasurer before receiving any contribution or expending any money for the purpose of advocating the election or defeat of any candidate.

A campaign treasurer of a political action committee may appoint deputy campaign treasurers as may be required. The committees shall file the names and addresses of the deputy campaign treasurers with the board of elections.

Any political action committee may remove at any time its campaign treasurer. In the case of the death, resignation, or removal of its campaign treasurer, any committee shall appoint a successor as soon as practicable and shall file his or her name and address with the board of elections within ten (10) days.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 1.

17-25-9.
Designation of campaign treasurer of political party committees — Filings.

Each state and municipal committee of a political party shall, on or before January 31 of each year, designate a campaign treasurer and shall file the name and address of that person with the board of elections.

A campaign treasurer of the state or municipal committee of a political party may appoint deputy campaign treasurers as may be required. The committees shall file the names and addresses of the deputy campaign treasurers with the board of elections.

Any state or municipal committee of a political party may remove at any time its campaign treasurer. In the case of the death, resignation, or removal of its campaign treasurer, any committee shall appoint a successor as soon as practicable and file his or her name and address with the board of elections within ten (10) days.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 347, § 1.